Washington statutes.
RCW 4.105.090

Costs, attorneys' fees, and expenses.

On a motion under RCW 4.105.020, the court shall award court costs, reasonable attorneys' fees, and reasonable litigation expenses related to the motion:

(1) To the moving party if the moving party prevails on the motion; or

(2) To the responding party if the responding party prevails on the motion and the court finds that the motion was not substantially justified or filed solely with intent to delay the proceeding.

[ 2021 c 259 s 10.]